Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6907
Violation by
physician; penalty; civil action; immunity;
prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1)
Any physician or attending physician who knowingly and intentionally or with reckless disregard performs
an abortion in violation of sections 71-6901 to 71-6906 and 71-6909 to 71-6911 shall be guilty of a
Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Performance of an abortion in violation of such sections
shall be grounds for a civil action by a person wrongfully denied the right and opportunity to consent.

(3) A person shall be immune from liability under such sections
(a) if he or she establishes by written evidence that he or she relied upon
evidence sufficient to convince a careful and prudent person that the representations
of the pregnant woman regarding information necessary to comply with such
sections are bona fide and true or (b) if the person has performed an abortion
authorized by a court order issued pursuant to section 71-6903 or 71-6904.

(4) Any person
not authorized to provide consent under sections 71-6901 to 71-6911 who provides
consent is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(5) Any person who coerces
a pregnant woman to have an abortion is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1991, LB 425, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB690, § 11.